Utah statutes.
32A-1-401 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Alcohol training and education --
Revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal of licenses.
(1)  The commission may suspend, revoke, or not renew the license of any
licensee licensed by the commission if any of the following individuals, as
defined in Section 62A-15-401, fail to complete an alcohol training and
education seminar required in Section 62A-15-401:
(a)  an individual who manages operations at the premises of the licensee
engaged in the retail sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the
premises of the licensee;
(b)  an individual who supervises the serving of alcoholic beverages to a
customer for consumption on the premises of the licensee; or
(c)  an individual who serves alcoholic beverages to a customer for
consumption on the premises of the licensee.
(2)  A city, town, or county in which an establishment conducts its business
may suspend, revoke, or not renew the business license of the establishment if
any individual described in Subsection (1) fails to complete an alcohol
training and education seminar required in Section 62A-15-401.
(3)  A local authority that issues an off-premise beer retailer license to a
business that is engaged in the retail sale of beer for consumption off the
beer retailer's premises may immediately suspend the license if any of the
following individuals fail to complete an alcohol training and education
seminar required in Sections 32A-10-103 and 62A-15-401, an individual who:
(a)  directly supervises the sale of beer to a customer for consumption off
the premises of the off-premise beer retailer licensee; or
(b)  sells beer to a customer for consumption off the premises of the off-
premise beer retailer licensee.
